California statutes. Labor Code
The division shall make every effort to ascertain the identities of existing users of carcinogens and to notify, inform, and educate them about the requirements of this part. The division shall utilize all appropriate means of communication and education, including direct mailings to employers, the use of courses, workshops, and seminars, advertising in mass media, trade and employee publications, and professional and scientific journals, contact with trade associations, employee representatives, and professional and scientific societies, and cooperation with other governmental agencies to inform affected employees, employers, and the public of the requirements of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Medical Examinations [9040. - 9040.]

9040.

Every employer using carcinogens shall provide for medical examinations of affected employees where required by standards adopted pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 142.3. The standards board shall continue to require medical examinations in at least as effective a manner as provided in Sections 5208, 5209, and 5210 of Title 8 of the California Administrative Code on January 1, 1986.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 226.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Inspections [9050. - 9052.]

9050.

The division shall establish priorities for the performance of inspections of premises for which uses have been reported pursuant to Section 9030 and shall perform as many of these inspections as possible within the limits of the resources available to it for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9051.

If an authorized representative of the division determines on the basis of an inspection that an employer is using a carcinogen in violation of the standards pertaining to its use, he or she shall immediately notify the employer and affected employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9052.

Upon request of any employer or any employee, or upon its own initiative, the OSHA Consultation Unit of the department shall provide consultation services regarding the use of a carcinogen and may offer educational programs to inform employers and employees of the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Penalties [9060. - 9061.]

9060.

The civil penalties prescribed by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 6423) of Part 1 shall be applicable to violations of standards and special orders regulating the use of carcinogens, except as modified by the following:

(a) A civil penalty assessed against an employer because of failure to report, as required by standards specified in Section 9030, shall be not less than five hundred dollars ($500).

(b) A civil penalty assessed pursuant to Section 6429 for repeated violations of standards or special orders specified in subdivision (a) shall be not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(c) A civil penalty assessed
 pursuant to Section 6429 for repeated serious violations shall be not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

The maximum limitations on civil penalties specified in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 6423) of Part 1 shall be applicable to civil penalties for which the minimum amount is prescribed by subdivision (a), (b), or (c). Nothing in this section shall supersede any provision of law prescribing criminal offenses or penalties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 35.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

9061.

(a) For purposes of this part, “serious violation” shall have the meaning specified in Section 6432 and, except as provided in subdivision (b), shall additionally include any violation of a standard or special order respecting the use of a carcinogen.

(b) A violation of a standard or special order respecting the use of a carcinogen shall not, be a “serious violation” if the employer did not, and could not, with the exercise of reasonable diligence, know of the presence of the violation or if the violation is minor and resulted in no substantial health hazard, as determined by the division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 11. COMMERCIAL ESTABLISHMENTS [9100. - 9104.]



  CHAPTER 1. Working Warehouses [9100. - 9104.]

9100.

For purposes of this chapter, “sales floor” means any area where the public is invited to shop, whether indoors or outdoors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 856, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9101.

For purposes of this chapter, “working warehouse” means a wholesale or retail establishment in which both of the following occur:

(a) Heavy machinery, including, but not limited to, forklifts, is used in any area where the public shops while customers are on the premises.

(b) Merchandise is stored on shelves higher than 12 feet above the sales floor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 856, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9102.

(a) The owner, manager, or operator of a working warehouse shall secure merchandise stored on shelves higher than 12 feet above the sales floor. Methods of securing merchandise shall include rails, fencing, netting, security doors, gates, cables, or the binding of items on a pallet into one unit by shrink-wrapping, metal or plastic banding, or by tying items together with a cord.

(b) All working warehouses shall comply with the provisions of this section on or before July 1, 2002.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 166.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

9103.

(a) When heavy machinery is used to move merchandise from a shelf, there shall be a safety zone established to temporarily block customers from entering areas where merchandise could fall during removal from a shelf.

(b) All working warehouses shall comply with the provisions of this section on or before July 1, 2002.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 167.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

9104.

An owner, manager, or operator of a working warehouse who employs more than 50 employees shall submit to the division, a report of all known injuries requiring hospitalization, including emergency room medical treatment, or deaths occurring to customers as the result of falling merchandise. The report shall be filed within 30 days of December 31, 2002, and within 30 days of December 31, 2003. Each year, a corporation owning, managing, or operating more than one working warehouse may submit a single report on behalf of all of the corporation’s working warehouses in the state, provided that the report identifies the location of the warehouse where each reportable incident occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 856, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 12. Agricultural Workers [9110. - 9110.]

9110.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Agricultural employee” means a person employed in any of the following:

(A) An agricultural occupation, as defined in Wage Order No. 14 of the Industrial Welfare Commission.

(B) An industry preparing agricultural products for the market, on the farm, as defined in Wage Order No. 13 of the Industrial Welfare Commission.

(C) An industry handling products after harvest, as defined in Wage Order No. 8 of the Industrial Welfare Commission.

(2) “Board” means the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board.

(3) “Wildfire smoke” means emissions from fires in “wildlands,” as defined in Section 3402 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations, or in adjacent developed areas.

(b) The division shall review and update the content of the training prescribed in Section 5141.1 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations, and shall thereafter post it on its internet website.

(c) The training provided by the employer is required to be in a language and manner readily understandable by employees, taking into account their ethnic and cultural backgrounds and education levels, including the use of pictograms, as necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 322, Sec. 2.   (AB 73)   Effective September 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 13. SAFETY IN MOTION PICTURE PRODUCTIONS [9150. - 9161.]

9150.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(1) All workers deserve a safe and healthy workplace. Because the sets of motion picture productions have potential hazards, proactive planning and oversight of the workplace are key to worker safety.

(2) The growing popularity of a diverse array of media platforms and reality television and increased customer demand for new content and new production has increased the need for safety on sets.

(3) Improving the overall health and safety on motion picture production sets is especially critical for the safe handling of firearms.

(4) The primary protections for the cast and crew in a motion picture production, including when firearms are used, are found in voluntary safety standards developed by the Industry-Wide Labor-Management Safety Committee for use in motion picture production.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to do the following:

(1) Establish a pilot program to address the implementation and oversight of safety practices and procedures in motion picture productions participating in the pilot program.

(2) Require the productions in the pilot program to employ a safety advisor to oversee production safety and complete detailed, script-specific general and, if applicable, specific risk assessments as part of this pilot program.

(3) Establish training requirements and safety standards that focus on the safe handling of firearms and blanks in all motion picture production in California.

(4) Prohibit, except in the most limited circumstances, the use of live ammunition in motion picture production in California.

(c) It is not the intent of the Legislature in enacting this part to do either of the following:

(1) Adversely impact the employment or retention of craft employees responsible for handling firearms used in motion picture productions.

(2) Preclude the use of firearms, blanks, replicas, simulated firearms, or inert prop firearms or to influence content in motion picture productions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 56, Sec. 3.   (SB 132)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 9161.)
-------------------------------------------

9151.

As used in this part:

(a) “Ammunition” means one or more loaded cartridges consisting of a primed case, propellant, and with one or more projectiles. “Ammunition” does not include blanks.

(b) “Blank” means a cartridge consisting of a primer cap, a shell case, and a quantity of gunpowder, but that does not contain a projectile.

(c) “Division” means the Division of Occupational Safety and Health.

(d) “Employer” means an employer engaged in producing a motion picture production.

(e) “Filming activities” includes
 principal photography and any subsequent filming, such as reshoots or additional scenes, as well as the construction and breakdown of sets and loading equipment, but does not include postproduction activity, including, but not limited to, editing, sound mixing, additional dialogue, or visual effects unrelated to reshoots.

(f) “Firearm” means a device, designed to expel through a barrel a projectile by the force of an explosion or other form of combustion, including the frame or receiver of the device. “Firearm” does not include a replica or simulated firearm or a special effects device.

(g) “Industry-Wide Labor-Management Safety Committee” or “committee” means the California group composed of union, guild, and employer representatives that establishes safety guidelines for motion picture production and that meets regularly.

(h) “Motion picture production” means the development or creation of motion pictures, television programs, streaming productions, commercial advertisements, music videos, or any other moving images, including, but not limited to, productions made for entertainment, commercial, religious, or educational purposes.

(i) “Pilot program” means the Safety on Productions Pilot Program established in Sections 9152 and 9152.5.

(j) “Risk assessment” is a detailed written review of a script and production plan prepared in accordance with Section 9152.5.

(k) “Safety advisor” means a person who works in tandem with, but independent of, performers and crew and who is not employed for any other role on the motion picture production; who reports to the unit production
 manager, or a person or persons having overall responsibility for the safety program, but retains autonomy to address production-related risk, including, as a last resort, the authority to temporarily halt production until a thorough examination of the potential hazard or hazards and the mitigation plan can take place among the decisionmakers on productions; and who meets the following qualifications:

(1) One of the following:

(A) At least two years’ experience primarily performing safety-related work in the entertainment industry as a department head, foreperson, or in a production safety position within motion picture production.

(B) At least 500 verifiable days in another crew position in motion picture production, so long as they possess an appropriate breadth of specialist knowledge, experience, and expertise
 aimed at minimizing risks to both performers and crew.

(C) Five or more years of safety-related work, where safety was a primary role and responsibility, in another industry, so long as they possess an appropriate breadth of specialist knowledge, experience, and expertise aimed at minimizing risks to workers and the public.

(2) Completion of a joint labor and management training on industry protocols, state and federal law, and safety practices in motion picture production.

(3) Completion of an OSHA 30-hour training for general industry.

(l) “Specific risk assessment” means a risk assessment for identified high-risk activities or situations prepared in accordance with Section 9152.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 56, Sec. 3.   (SB 132)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 9161.)
-------------------------------------------

9152.

(a) The Safety on Productions Pilot Program is hereby established. Commencing July 1, 2025, until June 30, 2030, inclusive, an employer for a motion picture production that receives a motion picture tax credit pursuant to a tax credit program that succeeds, on or after July 1, 2025, the tax credit program established in Section 17053.98 or 23698 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall, for that motion picture production, hire or assign a safety advisor for California filming activities by the time the department heads start the preproduction process of planning for construction or high-risk activities to perform a risk assessment and, if required under this part, a specific risk assessment, to be completed in collaboration and consultation with appropriate production personnel, including, but not limited to,
 department heads and those with specialized knowledge. There shall be a dedicated safety advisor present on every motion picture production in the pilot program who is assigned exclusively to that motion picture production. The safety advisor shall have the authority to determine which worksite is most appropriate to have a physical presence on when multiple production-related activities are taking place in multiple locations.

(b) Any specific risk assessment shall be revised if there are meaningful changes to the proposed activity or location that would change the specific risk assessment or mitigation plan.

(c) All risk assessments shall be accessible via electronic transmission, upon request, to performers, crew, and labor organization representatives.

(d) The safety advisor shall have access to, and the
 opportunity to inspect, all locations, facilities, equipment, supplies, materials, and props to safeguard the safety of the performers and crew members. Access or inspection by a safety advisor pursuant to this subdivision does not include handling or otherwise touching a firearm.

(e) Production shall conduct a daily safety meeting, including, but not limited to, the meeting required in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 9153.

(f) The safety advisor shall participate in daily safety meetings when occurring at the safety advisor’s selected worksite or worksites, if there are multiple production-related activities taking place in multiple locations.

(g) The employer shall identify a person for performers, crew, labor organization representatives, and the division to contact for issues regarding compliance.

(h) The safety advisor shall prepare a final safety evaluation report based on the actual risk and compliance experience, as set forth in subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive. Within 60 days following completion of filming activities, the safety advisor shall provide the final safety evaluation report to the Industry-Wide Labor-Management Safety Committee and the California Film Commission. Unplanned or unknown reshoots or additional scenes filmed after the submission of the initial report shall require an addendum report.

(i) (1) The Industry-Wide Labor-Management Safety Committee and the California Film Commission shall jointly select an organization or firm to perform a written evaluation of the pilot program. The selected organization or firm shall review and assess the final safety evaluation reports on or before June 30, 2029, and make a nonbinding set of
 recommendations to the Legislature as to whether the pilot program should be implemented on a permanent basis and to what other motion pictures productions in this state it should, or should not, be extended. The California Film Commission shall not be responsible for the cost of the written evaluation.

(2) The report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(j) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 56, Sec. 3.   (SB 132)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 9161.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

9152.5.

Risk assessments shall be performed in accordance with the following:

(a) A risk assessment shall be written and shall be a script and production plan that identifies and evaluates preproduction and production activity or production locations that may pose a risk and hazard to employees and sets forth a mitigation plan of those risks and hazards. Department heads and those with specialized knowledge shall be involved in creating a plan to mitigate risk. The process for developing the risk assessment shall commence once the department heads start preproduction planning for construction or high-risk activities.

(b) A specific risk assessment shall be written and shall comply with the following:

(1) Be focused on identified high-risk activities or situations.

(2) Include detailed and specific risk mitigation plans and procedures to identify and evaluate workplace hazards that have an elevated risk factor or factors or a combination of multiple risk factors.

(3) Identify the precautions and controls to be taken to mitigate that risk and reevaluate the level of risk assuming those controls are implemented or if no steps are taken to mitigate that risk.

(4) Identify the group of employees affected by the assessed risk.

(c) A specific risk assessment shall be performed for the use of the following:

(1) Firearms.

(2) Major pyrotechnics and explosives.

(3) Major stunts.

(4) Process shot moves.

(5) Aircraft or trains.

(6) Vehicles off road.

(7) Watercraft in open water and for individuals under water for prolonged periods.

(8) Workweeks of more than 60 hours.

(d) A safety advisor shall have the authority to determine if, and when, a specific risk assessment is necessary for both on and off set activities and situations, including the following:

(1) Overhead rigging.

(2) Rugged outdoor locations.

(3) Inclement weather.

(4) Animals.

(5) Heights.

(6) Intermittent traffic control.

(7) Night shoots.

(8) Other high-risk activities or situations as identified by the safety advisor.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 56, Sec. 3.   (SB 132)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 9161.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

9153.

(a) A firearm or blank shall only be permitted on motion picture productions, for the purposes of rehearsal, actor training, the filming of an on-camera sequence, or other development of content of the motion picture production with individuals of the performers or crew, under the following conditions:

(1) Under the custody and control of a qualified property master, armorer, or assistant property master.

(2) While handling the firearm, the property master, armorer, or assistant property master is the only person who can hand that firearm to the performer or cast or crew member standing in for that performer during the scene. Only the property master, armorer, or assistant property
 master shall collect the firearm upon completion of the activity.

(3) A property master, armorer, or assistant property master shall have no other duties, responsibilities, or obligations during the time the property master, armorer, or assistant property master is preparing for the use of a firearm and that a firearm is in the possession of the performer. It remains their sole responsibility until firearms are no longer in use and have been locked away.

(4) As indicated in safety bulletins of the Industry-Wide Labor-Management Safety Committee, a safety meeting shall be conducted when firearms are involved in a scene.

(5) The employer shall identify a person for performers, crew, labor organization representatives, and the division to contact for issues regarding compliance.

(6) The employer has ensured sufficient staffing of qualified property masters, armorers, or assistant property masters.

(b) A qualified property master, armorer, or assistant property master handling a firearm in the course of the motion picture production shall have all of the following:

(1) A current entertainment firearms permit or current dangerous weapons permit or license issued by the California Department of Justice.

(2) A joint entertainment industry labor-management firearm safety industry-specific training course certificate with training on industry protocols, state and federal law, and best practices on safety.

(3) One of the following:

(A) A signed rental sheet or copy of a completed Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives “ATF Form 4473,” stating the lawful transfer of Title 1 Firearms to that property master, armorer, or assistant property master or a copy of a current Federal Firearms License (FFL) establishing the property master, armorer, or assistant property master as the lawful possessor of the firearms who may obtain and retain custody of all firearms used in motion picture productions.

(B) In the event of the use of restricted firearms classified under the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives National Firearms Act Division (ATF NFA) rules, and including “assault weapons,” as defined by California law, a set of current dangerous weapons permits issued by the Department of Justice, or in the absence of such permits, a clearly dated extension letter for 120 days from the Department of
 Justice Bureau of Firearms permitting the property master, armorer, or assistant property master to continue their activities with restricted firearms, and a signed rental sheet from the federally licensed armory providing the firearms, or a current FFL and current ATF Special Occupational Tax Stamp establishing lawful possession of restricted firearms by that property master, armorer, or assistant property master shall be presented for the property master, armorer, or assistant property master to obtain and retain custody of NFA firearms. In such a case, the dangerous weapons permits issued by the Department of Justice shall supersede the entertainment firearms permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 56, Sec. 3.   (SB 132)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 9161.)
-------------------------------------------

9154.

(a) Employers engaged in motion picture production shall report to the division any serious injury or illness, or death, of an employee occurring in a place of employment or in connection with any employment pursuant to Section 342 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations. Pursuant to Section 6309, if the division learns or has reason to believe that an employment or place of employment is not safe or is injurious to the welfare of an employee, the division, on its own motion or upon complaint, may summarily investigate the employment or place of employment. Every inspection conducted by the division shall include an evaluation of the employer’s injury prevention program established pursuant to Section 6401.7 and any risk assessment for those participating in the pilot program established pursuant to
 Sections 9152 and 9152.5.

(b) Pursuant to Sections 6314 and 6317, if, upon inspection or investigation, the division determines that an employer has violated any standard, rule, order, regulation or these provisions, the division may with reasonable promptness issue a citation to the employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 56, Sec. 3.   (SB 132)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 9161.)
-------------------------------------------

9155.

(a) Ammunition shall not be permitted on a motion picture production, except as follows:

(1) In the controlled and supervised environment of a shooting range or equivalent and for the purposes of actor training or postproduction gunfire sound recording, a documentary, except reenactments, or firearms education.

(2) Where ammunition is essential to the subject matter of the work, such as a competitive reality show, a documentary, except dramatic reenactments, or a firearms education and safety training production.

(3) While filming footage of trained military or police personnel firing weapons in a controlled military
 or police facility.

(b) In the exceptions set forth in subdivision (a), all range safety rules, federal, state, and local laws, and Industry-Wide Labor-Management Safety Committee Safety Bulletins #1 and #2 shall be followed under the supervision of the property master, armorer, or qualified assistant property master. Appropriate medical personnel shall be available.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 56, Sec. 3.   (SB 132)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 9161.)
-------------------------------------------

9156.

Every employer shall require that any employee responsible for handling, or in proximity to, firearms on set completes a Contract Services Administration Trust Fund (CSATF) Firearms Safety Course for the Entertainment Industry, or an equivalent training, as determined by the Industry-Wide Labor-Management Safety Committee. This training requirement shall be paid for by the employer and is not limited to crew or guild members.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 56, Sec. 3.   (SB 132)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 9161.)
-------------------------------------------

9157.

An employer shall comply with this part and any applicable safety standard.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 56, Sec. 3.   (SB 132)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 9161.)
-------------------------------------------

9158.

This part does not apply to the following persons when they are on the perimeter of a set where motion picture production is happening:

(a) A registered security guard carrying a firearm in compliance with security guard firearms qualifications established in Sections 7583.2 to 7583.5, inclusive, of the Business and Professions Code, who is employed to provide security to the motion picture production and who, in the scope and the course of that employment, is at all times in possession and control of the firearm.

(b) A sworn peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, or sworn federal law enforcement officer, who is authorized to carry
 a firearm in the course and scope of the officer’s duties and who, in the scope and the course of their duties, is at all times in possession and control of the firearm.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 56, Sec. 3.   (SB 132)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 9161.)
-------------------------------------------

9159.

The division shall enforce this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 56, Sec. 3.   (SB 132)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 9161.)
-------------------------------------------

9160.

This part shall not prevent or limit employer adoption of stricter safety standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 56, Sec. 3.   (SB 132)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 9161.)
-------------------------------------------

9161.

This part shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 56, Sec. 3.   (SB 132)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 14. Safety on Staging for Live Events [9250. - 9254.]

9250.

For purposes of this part, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Auxiliary organization” means an entity that is included as an auxiliary organization pursuant to Section 89901 of the Education Code.

(b) “Contract” means an existing event and reservation agreement between a contracting entity and an entertainment events vendor to set up, operate, or tear down a live event at a public events venue.

(c) “Contracting entity” means a body that contracts with an entertainment events vendor to set up, operate, or tear down a live event at a public events venue.

(d) “Division” means the Division of Occupational Safety and Health.

(e) “Entertainment events vendor” means a private
 employer that contracts to set up, operate, or tear down a live event and includes any subcontractor employer involved in the event’s setting up, operation, or tearing down.

(f) “Entertainment Services and Technology Association” means the nonprofit trade association based in North America for the entertainment technology industry that develops standards for entertainment crafts through an accredited American National Standards Institute technical standards program. 

(g) “Entertainment Technician Certification Program” means the industry and labor nongovernmental program of the Entertainment Services and Technology Association that grants certification to a worker who has demonstrated mastery as an entertainment technician.

(h) “Heads of departments” and “leads” means any worker that leads, supervises, or directs one or more workers in that same occupation and is employed in an occupation that may be certified by the Entertainment Technician Certification Program.

(i) “Cal/OSHA-10” means a 10-hour course offered by a training provider that is authorized by an OSHA Training Institute Education Center to provide the course. 

(j) “OSHA-10” means the United States Department of Labor’s Occupational Safety and Health Administration’s 10-hour course on workplace health and safety.

(k) “OSHA-10/General Entertainment Safety” means the United States Department of Labor’s Occupational Safety and Health
 Administration’s 10-hour course on workplace health and safety specific to the entertainment and exhibition industries.

(l) “Cal/OSHA-30” means a 30-hour course offered by a training provider that is authorized by an OSHA Training Institute Education Center to provide the course. 

(m) “OSHA-30” means the United States Department of Labor’s Occupational Safety and Health Administration’s 30-hour course on workplace health and safety.

(n) “OSHA-30/General Entertainment Safety” means the United States Department of Labor’s Occupational Safety and Health Administration’s 30-hour course on workplace health and safety specific to the entertainment and exhibition industries.

(o) “Public events venue” means a state-operated fairground, county fairground, state park, California State
 University, University of California, or auxiliary organization-run facility that hosts live events. 

(p) “Operate” means to operate effects on an event set, including, but not limited to, lighting, sound, pyrotechnics, machinery, electrical apparatus, scenery, audiovisual, or rigging. 

(q) “Skilled and trained workforce” has the same meaning as
 defined in Section 2601 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 759, Sec. 2.   (AB 1775)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9251.

(a) A contracting entity shall require an entertainment events vendor to certify for its employees, and any subcontractors’ employees, as part of the contract for production of any live event at its public events venue, both of the following:

(1) An employee of an entertainment events vendor involved in the setting up, operation, or tearing down of a live event at the venue has completed the Cal/OSHA-10, the OSHA-10/General Entertainment Safety training, or the OSHA-10 as applicable to their occupation.

(2) One of the following applies:

(A) Heads of departments and
 leads have completed the Cal/OSHA-30, the OSHA-30/General Entertainment Safety training, or the OSHA-30, and are certified through the Entertainment Technician Certification Program relevant to the task or tasks they are supervising or performing, or another certification program, as specified by the division.

(B) The entertainment events vendor certifies that its employees and any subcontractors’ employees meet the conditions for a skilled and trained workforce.

(b) An entertainment events vendor shall certify in writing, and as part of the contract, that they have verified the training completion and certification requirements of all employees, and any subcontractor’s employees, who will work on the setting up, operation, or tearing down of the event.

(c) (1) The contract shall provide in writing that the entertainment events vendor shall furnish, upon hiring for the live event pursuant to the contract, the contracting entity with both of the following:

(A) The names of the employees of the entertainment events vendor and the names of employees of any subcontractors.

(B) What training or certification the employee has completed and the date of certification, as specified by this section.

(2) The contract is subject to Section 7928.801 of the Government Code.

(3) The contracting entity may use or disclose to third parties the
 information provided pursuant to paragraph (1) for the purpose of carrying out the contracting entity’s duties under the contract, including, but not limited to, verifying an employee’s training and certification, but shall not use or disclose the information for purposes unrelated to the contracting entity’s duties under the contract.

(d) The requirements of this section shall not apply to a direct employee of the public events venue.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.   (AB 2738)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9252.

(a) The division shall enforce this part by the issuance of a citation alleging a violation of this part and a notice of civil penalty in a manner consistent with Section 6317. Any person who receives a citation and penalty may appeal the citation and penalty to the appeals board in a manner consistent with Section 6319.

(b) Penalties shall only be assessed against an entertainment events vendor, a public events venue, or a contracting entity, as these terms are defined in Section 9250, and shall not be assessed against an employee of an entertainment events vendor or an employee of a subcontractor for not completing the training or certification required by Section 9251.

(c) The issuance of a citation under this section is in addition to any other penalties authorized under Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.

(d) The division shall deposit the funds assessed pursuant to this section in the Occupational Safety and Health Fund established pursuant to Section 62.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 969, Sec. 3.   (AB 2738)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9252.1.

This part may also alternatively be enforced by a public prosecutor pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 180) of Division 1. If this part is enforced by a public prosecutor, then the public prosecutor may seek injunctive relief to prevent continued violations of Section 9251 and a maximum penalty of five hundred dollars ($500) per violation shall apply in lieu of Section 9252 or any other division enforcement requirements or appeals process.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 969, Sec. 4.   (AB 2738)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9253.

This part, or any related health and safety standard, does not prevent or limit an employer, contracting entity, or entertainment events vendor from adopting stricter safety standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 759, Sec. 2.   (AB 1775)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9254.

Nothing in this part relieves an employer from conducting any other training required under Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations and complying with any other occupational safety and health law or regulation, as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 759, Sec. 2.   (AB 1775)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 6. THE PROMOTE OWNERSHIP BY WORKERS FOR ECONOMIC RECOVERY ACT [10000. - 10010.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [10000. - 10001.]

10000.

This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Promote Ownership by Workers for Economic Recovery Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 808, Sec. 1.   (AB 2849)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10001.

(a) On August 14, 2019, the Governor signed Executive Order No. N-17-19 establishing the Future of Work Commission tasked with studying, among other matters, “the potential jobs of the future and opportunities to shape those jobs for the improvement of life for all of California,” “policies and practices that will help California’s businesses, workers, and communities thrive economically, while responding to rapid changes in technology and workplace structures and practices,”